Tennessee, session 114, SB1657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-118(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), nothing in this part authorizes
counties to prohibit or regulate normal agricultural activities.
(2) A county may authorize the application of sludge originating from a waste
water treatment or processing facility to agricultural land located within the
unincorporated areas of the county by adopting a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of
the county legislative body that establishes a tipping fee on each ton of sludge that is
applied to agricultural land in the unincorporated areas of the county. The fee must be
collected by the operator of the waste water treatment or processing facility that
generated the sludge and remitted to the county in which the sludge will be applied to
agricultural land. Revenue from a tipping fee established pursuant to this subdivision
(b)(2) must be expended only for the purpose of constructing and maintaining waste
water treatment or processing facilities in the county to which the fee is remitted.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-118(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), the powers granted by § 6-2-
201(22) and (23) shall not apply to those activities, businesses, or uses of property and
business occupations and practices that are subject to regulation pursuant to title 57,
SB1657
009581
- 1 -

chapters 5 and 6; title 59, chapter 8; title 60, chapter 1; title 68, chapters 201-221; or title
69, chapters 3, 7, 10, and 11.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 54, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, a municipality may authorize the
application of sludge originating from a waste water treatment or processing facility to
agricultural land located within its municipal boundaries by adopting a resolution by a
two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body that establishes a tipping fee on
each ton of sludge that is applied to agricultural land in the municipality. The fee must
be collected by the operator of the waste water treatment or processing facility that
generated the sludge and remitted to the municipality in which the sludge will be applied
to agricultural land. Revenue from a tipping fee established pursuant to this subdivision
(b)(2) must be expended only for the purpose of constructing and maintaining waste
water treatment or processing facilities in the municipality to which the fee is remitted.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, a metropolitan government may authorize
the application of sludge originating from a waste water treatment or processing facility
to agricultural land located within its boundaries by adopting a resolution by a two-thirds
(2/3) vote of the governing body that establishes a tipping fee on each ton of sludge that
is applied to agricultural land in the metropolitan government. The fee must be collected
by the operator of the waste water treatment or processing facility that generated the
sludge and remitted to the metropolitan government in which the sludge will be applied
to agricultural land. Revenue from a tipping fee established pursuant to this subdivision
(b)(2) must be expended only for the purpose of constructing and maintaining waste
- 2 - 009581

water treatment or processing facilities in the metropolitan government to which the fee
is remitted.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 69, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) No person shall apply sludge originating from a waste water treatment or
processing facility to agricultural land located in this state, unless:
(1) The land is located in jurisdiction that has approved such application
pursuant to § 5-1-118(b)(2), Section 3 of this act, or Section 4 of this act; or
(2) The person is acting pursuant to a valid permit issued pursuant to this
part.
(b) The commissioner shall not issue or renew a permit that authorizes the
permittee to apply sludge originating from a waste water treatment or processing facility
to agricultural land located in this state, unless the land is located in a jurisdiction that
has approved an application pursuant to § 5-1-118(b)(2), Section 3 of this act, or Section
4 of this act.
SECTION 6. Sections 1-4 of this act take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it. Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009581